District of Columbia statutes.
22-3805

Right to counsel.

A patient shall have the right to have the assistance of counsel at every stage of the proceeding under this chapter. Before the court appoints psychiatrists pursuant to § 22-3806 it shall advise the patient of his or her right to counsel and shall assign counsel to represent him or her unless the patient is able to obtain counsel or elects to proceed without counsel.

History

June 9, 1948, 62 Stat. 348, ch. 428, title II, § 203
May 21, 1994, D.C. Law 10-119, § 20(c), 41 DCR 1639

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 22-3505.
1973 Ed., § 22-3505.